Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5043.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2025, chapter 32, article 1, section 2, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Total Appropriation $ 101,148,000 $ deleted text begin 82,798,000 deleted text end new text begin 97,798,000 new text end (a) The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. (b) Unless otherwise specified, the appropriations for the programs in this section are appropriated and made available for the purposes of the housing development fund. Except as otherwise indicated, the amounts appropriated are part of the agency's permanent budget base. Sec. 2. Laws 2025, chapter 32, article 1, section 2, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Workforce Housing Development 2,000,000 deleted text begin 2,000,000 deleted text end new text begin 17,000,000 new text end new text begin (a) new text end This appropriation is for the greater Minnesota workforce housing development program under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.39. If requested by the applicant and approved by the agency, funded properties may include a portion of income- and rent-restricted units. Funded properties may include owner-occupied homes. new text begin (b) The base for this appropriation is $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2028 and thereafter. new text end